Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1047.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
Section 1. Title 36, chapter 28.2, Arizona Revised
Statutes, is amended by adding [sections 36-2868 and]
[section] 36-2869, to read:
[36-2868. Attorney general marijuana enforcement fund
A. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MARIJUANA ENFORCEMENT FUND IS
ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF THE MONIES TRANSFERRED TO THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL PURSUANT TO SECTION 36-2856 AND INTEREST
EARNED ON THOSE MONIES. MONIES IN THE FUND ARE CONTINUOUSLY
APPROPRIATED AND ARE EXEMPT FROM THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION
35-190 RELATING TO LAPSING OF APPROPRIATIONS. MONIES IN THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL MARIJUANA ENFORCEMENT FUND MAY NOT BE
TRANSFERRED TO ANY OTHER FUND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS
SECTION. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
B. MONIES IN THE FUND MUST FIRST BE USED TO PAY THE
REASONABLE COSTS INCURRED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL TO
ADMINISTER THE FUND.
C. AFTER THE PAYMENTS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION B OF THIS
SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL USE ALL REMAINING MONIES
IN THE FUND TO ENFORCE LAWS RELATING TO MARIJUANA AND FOR SUCH
OTHER PURPOSES AS THE ATTORNEY GENERAL DETERMINES ARE
APPROPRIATE, INCLUDING:

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1047
1. INVESTIGATING AND PROSECUTING FRAUD IN CONNECTION
WITH MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSES.
2. ENFORCING THIS CHAPTER RELATING TO THE SOCIAL EQUITY
OWNERSHIP PROGRAM.
3. SUPPORTING REENTRY PROGRAMS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH
PRIOR MARIJUANA-RELATED CONVICTIONS.
4. PROVIDING GRANTS TO COMMUNITIES THAT WERE
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED BY MARIJUANA ENFORCEMENT BEFORE
THE ENACTMENT OF THIS CHAPTER.
5. ADMINISTERING RECEIVERSHIP PROCEEDINGS PURSUANT TO
SECTION 36-2869.
D. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PRESCRIBE ANY FORMS OR
PROCEDURES NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE FUND AND MAKE
EXPENDITURES PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.]
36-2869. Attorney general; investigation; legal action;
definition
[A. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY APPOINT A RECEIVER TO
OVERSEE ANY MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THE
SOCIAL EQUITY OWNERSHIP PROGRAM ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 36-2854, SUBSECTION A, PARAGRAPH 9 IF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL DETERMINES THAT ANY OF THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS
EXISTS:
1. THE ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL OFFICER OR BOARD MEMBER WHO
HELD AT LEAST FIFTY-ONE PERCENT OWNERSHIP IN THE MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT HAS BEEN SUBJECT TO A PREDATORY AGREEMENT.
2. FRAUD WAS COMMITTED IN CONNECTION WITH THE
APPLICATION FOR THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE OR
OPERATION OF THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT.
3. A PRINCIPAL OFFICER OR BOARD MEMBER WHO HELD A
MINORITY INTEREST IN THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT VIOLATED ANY
RULES ADOPTED PURSUANT TO THIS CHAPTER.
4. A PRINCIPAL OFFICER OR BOARD MEMBER OF THE MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT FAILED TO DISCLOSE AN EXCLUDED FELONY OFFENSE AT
THE TIME OF APPLICATION.
5. THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE IS NOT BEING
OPERATED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE INTENT OF THE SOCIAL EQUITY
OWNERSHIP PROGRAM.
B. A RECEIVER WHO IS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION A
OF THIS SECTION MUST MEET BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING
QUALIFICATIONS:
1. DEMONSTRATE COMPETENCE IN MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT
MANAGEMENT THROUGH AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(a) A MINIMUM OF TEN YEARS OF EXPERIENCE AS A PRINCIPAL
OFFICER, BOARD MEMBER OR SENIOR MANAGER OF A MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT IN THIS STATE OR ANOTHER STATE WITH A REGULATED
MARIJUANA PROGRAM.
-2-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1047
(b) COMPLETION OF A MARIJUANA BUSINESS MANAGEMENT
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT COMBINED WITH
A MINIMUM OF TEN YEARS OF GENERAL BUSINESS MANAGEMENT
EXPERIENCE.
(c) A COMBINATION OF RELEVANT CANNABIS INDUSTRY AND
BUSINESS MANAGEMENT EXPERIENCE TOTALING AT LEAST TEN YEARS, AS
DEEMED SUFFICIENT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
2. BE A BONA FIDE RESIDENT OF THIS STATE FOR A MINIMUM
OF TEN CONSECUTIVE YEARS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE
APPOINTMENT, AS DEMONSTRATED BY TAX RETURNS, VOTER
REGISTRATION, DRIVER LICENSE RECORDS, PROPERTY OWNERSHIP
RECORDS OR OTHER DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL.
C. THE RECEIVER SHALL:
1. TAKE POSSESSION AND CONTROL OF THE MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE AND ALL ASSOCIATED ASSETS, INVENTORY AND
OPERATIONS.
2. OPERATE THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT IN COMPLIANCE
WITH ALL APPLICABLE LAWS AND RULES.
3. PRESERVE THE VALUE OF THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT
LICENSE AND BUSINESS OPERATIONS FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE
ORIGINAL SOCIAL EQUITY OWNERSHIP PROGRAM APPLICANT OR
QUALIFIED RESIDENT OF THIS STATE.
4. PROVIDE QUARTERLY REPORTS TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ON
THE STATUS OF THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT OPERATIONS AND
FINANCIAL CONDITION.
5. FACILITATE THE RESTORATION OF THE MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE TO A QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL OR ENTITY AS
DIRECTED BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
D. THE ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL OFFICER OR BOARD MEMBER WITH
AT LEAST FIFTY-ONE PERCENT OWNERSHIP OF ANY ENTITY THAT
RECEIVED A MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE UNDER THE SOCIAL
EQUITY OWNERSHIP PROGRAM ON APRIL 8, 2022 MAY PETITION THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL TO RESTORE THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT
LICENSE TO ANY ENTITY OF THE OFFICER'S OR BOARD MEMBER'S
CHOICE IF ANY OF THE CONDITIONS PRESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION A OF
THIS SECTION APPLIES.
E. THE RESTORATION OF THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT
LICENSE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION D OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S APPROVAL FOLLOWING A DETERMINATION THAT
ONE OR MORE OF THE CONDITIONS PRESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION A OF
THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN MET AND THAT THE PROPOSED TRANSFEREE
MEETS ALL APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS.
F. THE ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL OFFICER OR BOARD MEMBER WHO
HELD AT LEAST FIFTY-ONE PERCENT OWNERSHIP IN THE MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT AND WHO BELIEVES THE ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL OFFICER
OR BOARD MEMBER WAS THE SUBJECT OF A PREDATORY AGREEMENT OR
-3-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1047
THAT SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION OTHERWISE APPLIES MAY FILE A
COMPLAINT WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
SHALL INVESTIGATE AND DETERMINE WHETHER THE AGREEMENT IS A
PREDATORY AGREEMENT OR WHETHER ANY OTHER CONDITION PRESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION APPLIES.]
[G.] [A.] THE ATTORNEY GENERAL, IN [CONJUNCTION]
[CONSULTATION] WITH THE DEPARTMENT, MAY [TAKE APPROPRIATE
ENFORCEMENT] [INVESTIGATE AND COMMENCE LEGAL] ACTION AGAINST
ANY MARIJUANA FACILITY AGENT THAT [ENTERED] [ENTERS] INTO A
PREDATORY AGREEMENT OR [COMMITTED FRAUD TO TAKE CONTROL OF]
[FRAUDULENTLY ACQUIRES] A MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE.
ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS [UNDER THIS SUBSECTION] [PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION] MAY INCLUDE:
[1. APPOINTMENT OF A RECEIVER AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION
A OF THIS SECTION.]
[2.] [1.] REVOCATION OF ANY MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT
LICENSE [HELD BY THE VIOLATING PARTY].
[3.] [2.] DENIAL OR REVOCATION OF A MARIJUANA FACILITY
AGENT'S CARD.
[4. PERMANENT DISQUALIFICATION FROM HOLDING ANY
MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE OR MARIJUANA FACILITY AGENT
CARD IN THIS STATE.
H. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TAKE ACTION AGAINST A PARTY TO
A PREDATORY AGREEMENT AT MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE
RENEWAL OR MARIJUANA FACILITY AGENT CARD RENEWAL AS DIRECTED
BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
I. A PERSON WHO HAS BEEN THE SUBJECT OF A PREDATORY
AGREEMENT MAY ALSO BRING A PRIVATE ACTION IF THE PREDATORY
AGREEMENT CONSTITUTES FRAUD AGAINST THIS STATE.]
[J.] [B.] FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION[,] [: ]
[1. "MINIMUM FAIR MARKET VALUE" MEANS THE GREATER OF:
(a) THE TOTAL ANNUAL RECREATIONAL MARIJUANA REVENUE IN
TAX YEAR 2025 FOR ALL MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT LICENSES,
DIVIDED BY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ALL MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT
LICENSES, INCLUDING THOSE HELD BY DUAL LICENSEES.
(b) THE FAIR MARKET VALUE AS DETERMINED BY AN
INDEPENDENT APPRAISER LICENSED IN THIS STATE.
2.] "PREDATORY AGREEMENT" MEANS ANY AGREEMENT SIGNED
BEFORE OR WITHIN EIGHTEEN MONTHS AFTER A MARIJUANA
ESTABLISHMENT LICENSE UNDER THE SOCIAL EQUITY OWNERSHIP
PROGRAM WAS ISSUED THAT REQUIRED THE ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL
OFFICER OR BOARD MEMBER WHO HELD AT LEAST FIFTY-ONE PERCENT
OWNERSHIP OF THE MARIJUANA ESTABLISHMENT TO SELL, TRANSFER,
ASSIGN, PLEDGE, ENCUMBER OR OTHERWISE GIVE CONTROL OF THE
ORIGINAL PRINCIPAL OFFICER'S OR BOARD MEMBER'S OWNERSHIP
INTEREST, VOTING RIGHTS OR OPERATIONAL CONTROL FOR LESS THAN
-4-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1047
MINIMUM FAIR MARKET VALUE OR UNDER TERMS THAT A REASONABLE
PERSON WOULD CONSIDER UNCONSCIONABLE.
<<Sec. 2. Title 38, chapter 3, article 4, Arizona
Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-452, to
read:
38-452. Elected officials; public monies; liability;
definition
A. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, AN ELECTED OFFICIAL
OR APPOINTED OFFICIAL IN THIS STATE OR ANY POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE WHO KNOWINGLY VOTES FOR, APPROVES OR
DIRECTS PUBLIC MONIES TO PROVIDE BENEFITS, SERVICES OR
PAYMENTS TO INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE NOT UNITED STATES CITIZENS OR
LAWFUL PERMANENT RESIDENTS MAY BE PERSONALLY LIABLE FOR BOTH
OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF PUBLIC MONIES ALLOCATED.
2. REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS.
B. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO
ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
C. ANY IMMUNITY OR PRIVILEGE THAT IS AVAILABLE TO
PUBLIC OFFICIALS OR APPOINTED OFFICIALS DOES NOT APPLY TO
KNOWING VIOLATIONS OF THIS SECTION.
D. THIS STATE OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE
MAY NOT PAY OR REIMBURSE ANY JUDGMENT, SETTLEMENT OR LEGAL
FEES INCURRED BY AN OFFICIAL WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION.
E. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, "POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION" MEANS A CITY, TOWN OR COUNTY.
Sec. 3. Title 41, chapter 1, article 5, Arizona Revised
Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-191.14, to read:
41-191.14. Fraud; violation; civil penalty
A. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, A PERSON MAY NOT DO
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. KNOWINGLY PRESENT A FALSE OR FRAUDULENT CLAIM FOR
PAYMENT OR APPROVAL.
2. KNOWINGLY MAKE, USE OR CAUSE AN INDIVIDUAL TO MAKE
OR USE A FALSE RECORD OR MATERIAL STATEMENT.
3. HAVE POSSESSION, CUSTODY OR CONTROL OF PROPERTY OR
MONEY USED BY THIS STATE AND KNOWINGLY DELIVER LESS THAN ALL
OF THE PROPERTY OR MONEY.
4. KNOWINGLY MAKE OR USE A FALSE RECORD OR STATEMENT
THAT IS MATERIAL TO AN OBLIGATION TO PAY OR TRANSMIT MONEY OR
PROPERTY TO THIS STATE OR KNOWINGLY CONCEAL, IMPROPERLY AVOID
OR DECREASE AN OBLIGATION TO PAY OR TRANSMIT MONEY OR PROPERTY
TO THIS STATE.
5. KNOWINGLY OBTAIN A LICENSE, PERMIT, CERTIFICATE,
REGISTRATION OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION FROM ANY STATE AGENCY OR
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE BY FRAUD.
-5-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1047
6. KNOWINGLY OPERATE ANY ACTIVITY OR ENTERPRISE WHILE
AUTHORIZATION IS OBTAINED OR MAINTAINED BY FRAUD.
7. KNOWINGLY BENEFIT FROM THE FRAUD OF ANOTHER IN
CONNECTION WITH ANY PROGRAMS OR BENEFITS OFFERED BY THIS
STATE.
B. A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION
IS LIABLE FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. A CIVIL PENALTY OF AT LEAST $11,000 AND NOT MORE
THAN $25,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
2. TRIPLE THE AMOUNT OF DAMAGES SUSTAINED BY THIS
STATE.
3. THE COSTS OF ANY CIVIL ACTION, INCLUDING REASONABLE
ATTORNEY FEES AND INVESTIGATIVE COSTS.
C. ANY LICENSE, PERMIT, CERTIFICATE, REGISTRATION OR
OTHER AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY ANY STATE AGENCY OR POLITICAL
SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE SHALL BE REVOKED IF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL DETERMINES THAT FRAUD OCCURRED IN:
1. OBTAINING THE LICENSE, PERMIT, CERTIFICATE,
REGISTRATION OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION.
2. THE OPERATION OF THE AUTHORIZED ACTIVITY.
3. ANY DEALINGS BETWEEN THE LICENSE, PERMIT,
CERTIFICATE, REGISTRATION OR OTHER AUTHORIZATION HOLDER AND
THIS STATE OR ANY POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE.
D. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY INVESTIGATE AND TAKE
APPROPRIATE ACTION AS PRESCRIBED IN TITLE 44, CHAPTER 10,
ARTICLE 7.
E. A CIVIL ACTION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION SHALL BE
BROUGHT WITHIN SIX YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE VIOLATION WAS
COMMITTED OR WITHIN THREE YEARS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH FACTS
MATERIAL TO THE ACTION ARE KNOWN OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE
BEEN KNOWN BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.>>
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona.
Enroll and engross to conform
Amend title to conform
KEVIN PAYNE
SCR1047FloorPAYNE.docx
02/23/2026
2:37 PM
C: MH
130DZJYMB
-6-